Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1101
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds it to be in the public interest of the state and its citizens to promote the efficient development and prevent the waste of geothermal resources. Geothermal energy is an indigenous, renewable resource the development of which will benefit local economies. The Legislature further finds and declares that a permit system is necessary to protect Nebraska's ground and surface water resources and existing water users, particularly where the development of geothermal energy requires the utilization of geothermal resources at a location other than the well site.

Laws 1982, LB 708, § 1.